Maine, session 132, LD2147.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. University of Maine System funding for academic support and
college and career preparation; use of funds. The University of Maine System shall
administer the funds appropriated in section 3. The funds must be used solely to provide
academic support and college and career preparation services to students at Buckfield
Junior-Senior High School, Dirigo High School, Edward Little High School, Mountain
Valley High School, Oxford Hills Comprehensive High School and Telstar High School in
Androscoggin and Oxford counties who meet the eligibility qualifications of the United
States Department of Education's Upward Bound program. Services may include, but are
not limited to, academic advising, tutoring in mathematics and English language arts, peer
mentoring, support in applying for higher education and accessing financial aid, career
exploration and planning and on-campus summer residential experiences.
Sec. 2. Report. That, by December 1, 2027, the University of Maine System shall
submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
education matters that includes an overview of the services provided pursuant to section 1.
The report must include student outcomes such as high school grade point average,
retention, graduation and postsecondary enrollment. The joint standing committee may
report out legislation related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 133rd
Legislature.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE
Educational and General Activities - UMS 0031
Initiative: Provides a one-time appropriation to the University of Maine System to provide
academic support and college and career preparation services to eligible students in 6 high
schools in Androscoggin and Oxford counties previously served by the University of Maine
at Farmington's River Valley Upward Bound program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $309,505
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $309,505